Utah statutes.
31A-9-205.   Organization permit and certificate of incorporation.

(1)  Section 31A-5-204 applies to fraternals except that the word "mutual" shall be read "fraternal" and "Section 31A-5-211" in Subsection 31A-5-204(5) shall be read "Section 31A-9-209."

(2)  The application for an organization permit shall include, in addition to those things required under Subsection 31A-5-204(2), a statement of the plan for fraternal activities and for the formation of a representative government under Section 31A-9-403.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

